Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-822
Books and records; requirements.

The director shall make and keep books and records which accurately and fairly reflect transactions of the lottery games conducted pursuant to the State Lottery Act, including the distribution of tickets to lottery game retailers, receipt of funds, prize claims, prizes paid, expenses, and all other activities and financial transactions involving revenue generated by such lottery games, so as to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain daily accountability.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 42.